Utah statutes.
32A-10-303.   Qualifications.
(1) (a)  The commission may not grant a temporary special event beer permit to
any person who has been convicted of:
(i)  a felony under any federal or state law;
(ii)  any violation of any federal or state law or local ordinance concerning
the sale, manufacture, distribution, warehousing, adulteration, or
transportation of alcoholic beverages;
(iii)  any crime involving moral turpitude; or
(iv)  on two or more occasions within the five years before the day on which
the permit is granted, driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug.
(b)  In the case of a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company,
the proscription under Subsection (1)(a) applies if any of the following has
been convicted of an offense described in Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  a partner;
(ii)  a managing agent;
(iii)  a manager;
(iv)  an officer;
(v)  a director;
(vi)  a stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding
stock of the applicant corporation; or
(vii)  a member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability
company.
(c)  The proscription under Subsection (1)(a) applies if any person employed
to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for the temporary special event
beer permittee has been convicted of any offense as provided in Subsection
(1)(a).
(2)  The commission may immediately suspend or revoke a temporary special
event permit if after the day on which the permit is granted, a person
described in Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c):
(a)  is found to have been convicted of any offense described in Subsection
(1)(a) prior to the permit being granted; or
(b)  on or after the day on which the permit is granted:
(i)  is convicted of an offense described in Subsection (1)(a)(i), (ii), or
(iii); or
(ii) (A)  is convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug; and
(B)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the
combined influence of alcohol and any drug within five years before the day on
which the person is convicted of the offense described in Subsection
(2)(b)(ii)(A).
(3)  The director may take emergency action by immediately revoking the
temporary special event permit according to the procedures and requirements of
Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, if a person described in
Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c):
(a)  is arrested on a charge for an offense described in Subsection (1)(a)(i),
(ii), or (iii); or
(b) (i)  is arrested on a charge for the offense of driving under the
influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any
drug; and
(ii)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug within five years before the
day on which the person is arrested on a charge described in Subsection
(3)(b)(i).
(4) (a) (i)  The commission may not grant a temporary special event beer
permit to any person who has had any type of license, agency, or permit issued
under this title revoked within the last three years.
(ii)  The commission may not grant a temporary special event permit to an
applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company if
any partner, managing agent, manager, officer, director, stockholder who holds
at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of an applicant
corporation, or member who owns at least 20% of an applicant limited liability
company is or was:
(A)  a partner or managing agent of any partnership that had any type of
license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last
three years;
(B)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds or held at
least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of any corporation that
had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked
within the last three years; or
(C)  a manager or member who owns or owned at least 20% of any limited
liability company that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under
this title revoked within the last three years.
(b)  An applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability
company may not be granted a temporary special event permit if any of the
following had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title
revoked while acting in their individual capacity within the last three years:
(i)  any partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;
(ii)  any managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or
(iii)  any manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company.
(c)  A person acting in an individual capacity may not be granted a temporary
special event permit if that person was:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of a partnership that had any type of
license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last
three years;
(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who held at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of a corporation that had any
type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the
last three years; or
(iii)  a manager or member who owned at least 20% of the limited liability
company that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this
title revoked within the last three years.
(5) (a)  A minor may not be:
(i)   granted a temporary special event permit; or
(ii)  employed by a temporary special event permittee to handle alcoholic
beverages.
(b)  The commission may not grant a temporary special event permit to an
applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company if
any of the following is a minor:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;
(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or
(iii)  a manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company.
(6)  If any person to whom a permit has been issued under this part no longer
possesses the qualifications required by this title for obtaining that permit,
the commission may suspend or revoke that permit.
